apertium-ara-heb.heb.dix
    <pardef n="מזומ/ן__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נים</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ני</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניי</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נינו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נייך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניכם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניכן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניהן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניה</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניהם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="מי/ם__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מי</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיי</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מינו</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיך</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מייך</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיכם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיכן</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיהן</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיו</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיה</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיהם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="עש/ן__n_m">
      <!-- TODO complete pardef -->
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ני</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ננו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נכם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נכן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נה</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="גט/ו__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואי</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואנו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואך</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואך</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואכם</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואכן</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואן</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואה</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואם</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אות</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אות</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיי</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותינו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיך</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותייך</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיכם</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיכן</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיהן</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיה</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיהם</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="חילון"><par n="ה"/><i>חילו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ריקון"><par n="ה"/><i>ריקו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כיחלון"><par n="ה"/><i>כיחלו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שידפון"><par n="ה"/><i>שידפו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רוויון"><par n="ה"/><i>רוויו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מצפון"><par n="ה"/><i>מצפו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מזומן"><par n="ה"/><i>מזומ</i><par n="מזומ/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיכרון"><par n="ה"/><i>שיכרו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שאון"><par n="ה"/><i>שאו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קיטון"><par n="ה"/><i>קיטו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מים"><par n="ה"/><i>מי</i><par n="מי/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיוורון"><par n="ה"/><i>חיוורו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיממון"><par n="ה"/><i>שיממו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צפון"><par n="ה"/><i>צפו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיזפון"><par n="ה"/><i>שיזפו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זוקן"><par n="ה"/><i>זוק</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תבן"><par n="ה"/><i>תב</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חרון"><par n="ה"/><i>חרו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיכחון"><par n="ה"/><i>פיכחו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הון"><par n="ה"/><i>הו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לובן"><par n="ה"/><i>לוב</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צימאון"><par n="ה"/><i>צימאו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גטו"><par n="ה"/><i>גט</i><par n="גט/ו__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="טמיון"><par n="ה"/><i>טמיו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צביון"><par n="ה"/><i>צביו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עשן"><par n="ה"/><i>עש</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רזון"><par n="ה"/><i>רזו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פריון"><par n="ה"/><i>פריו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="יושן"><par n="ה"/><i>יוש</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מאמין"><par n="ה"/><i>מאמי</i><par n="מזומ/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שתן"><par n="ה"/><i>שת</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קוטן"><par n="ה"/><i>קוט</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דאבון"><par n="ה"/><i>דאבו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כיליון"><par n="ה"/><i>כיליו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עיוורון"><par n="ה"/><i>עיוורו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תימהון"><par n="ה"/><i>תימהו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ריקבון"><par n="ה"/><i>ריקבו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קיפאון"><par n="ה"/><i>קיפאו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רעבון"><par n="ה"/><i>רעבו</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פשתן"><par n="ה"/><i>פשת</i><par n="עש/ן__n_m"/></e>
